Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 8

Arkansas Arts Council

Subchapter 1

— Arkansas State Arts Act of 1971

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2003, No. 608, § 1, provided:

“The Office of Arkansas State Arts and Humanities is renamed the Arkansas Arts Council.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 359, § 6: Mar. 22, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found that there is an immediate need to establish the Office of Arkansas State Arts and Humanities so as to ensure the state's participation in various programs designed to benefit its citizens of all ages and from every community; therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, peace and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 715, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under §25-15-105, the authority of the Arkansas Arts Council to charge certain fees currently collected by the council will expire on July 1, 2013, and that this act is necessary to allow the council to continue to collect the revenues it currently receives and to allow the council to maintain its current level of operation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-8-101. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the Arkansas State Arts Act of 1971.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 359, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1001; Acts 2003, No. 608, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment deleted “and Humanities” following “Arts.”

13-8-102. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Agency” means the Arkansas Arts Council established in this subchapter. The agency shall include the advisory council and the position of executive director as established in this subchapter;

(2)

“Arts” includes, but is not limited to:

(A)

Instrumental and vocal music;

(B)

Dance;

(C)

Drama;

(D)

Painting;

(E)

Sculpture;

(F)

Creative writing;

(G)

Architectural and allied fields;

(H)

Graphics;

(I)

Folk art;

(J)

Porcelain art;

(K)

China painting;

(L)

Craft art;

(M)

Industrial design;

(N)

Costume and fashion design;

(O)

Motion pictures;

(P)

Television;

(Q)

Radio;

(R)

Tape and sound recordings; and

(S)

The arts related to the presentation, performance, execution, and exhibition of such major art forms;

(3)

“Group” includes any state or other public agency and any nonprofit society, institution, organization, association, museum, or establishment in Arkansas, whether or not incorporated;

(4)

“Office” means the Arkansas Arts Council established in this subchapter. The office shall include the advisory council and the position of executive director as established in this subchapter;

(5)

“Production” means:

(A)

A play, with or without music;

(B)

A ballet;

(C)

A dance or choral performance;

(D)

A concert;

(E)

A recital;

(F)

An opera;

(G)

An exhibition;

(H)

A reading;

(I)

A motion picture;

(J)

Television;

(K)

Radio;

(L)

A tape or sound recording; and

(M)

Any other activity involving the execution or rendition of the arts and meeting any standards approved by the agency; and

(6)

“Project” means:

(A)

A program organized to carry out the purposes of this subchapter, including a program:

(i)

To foster artistic creativity;

(ii)

To commission works of art;

(iii)

To create opportunities for individuals to develop artistic talents when carried on as a part of a program otherwise included in this definition; and

(iv)

To develop and enhance public knowledge and understanding of the arts and humanities; and

(B)

“Project” also includes, when appropriate:

(i)

The rental, purchase, renovation, or construction of a facility;

(ii)

The purchase or rental of land; and

(iii)

The acquisition of equipment, supplies, materials, and other personal property.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 359, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1002; Acts 1995, No. 1119, § 1; 2003, No. 608, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment deleted “unless the context otherwise requires” from the introductory language; inserted present (1); redesignated former (1) as present (2); deleted former (2); substituted “agency” for “office” in (3)(M); made stylistic changes in (4); substituted “subdivision (4)” for “definitions” in (4)(A)(iii); and deleted (6) and made related changes.

13-8-103. Establishment and composition.

(a)

There is established the Arkansas Arts Council under the laws of the State of Arkansas and under the jurisdiction and supervision of the Division of Arkansas Heritage.

(b)(1)

The Arkansas Arts Council shall consist of an advisory council and a director.

(2)

The Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council shall develop and implement a comprehensive statewide program for the support of the arts in Arkansas pursuant to this subchapter.

(3)

The Director of the Arkansas Arts Council shall administer the provisions of this subchapter and the rules and orders established under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 359, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1003; Acts 2003, No. 608, § 4; 2005, No. 1962, § 54; 2019, No. 910, §
5610.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2003, No. 608, § 1, provided:

“The Office of Arkansas State Arts and Humanities is renamed the Arkansas Arts Council.”

Publisher's Notes.

The Office of Arkansas State Arts and Humanities was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Heritage by Acts 1975, No. 1001, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment, in (a), substituted “Arkansas Arts Council” for “Office of Arkansas State Arts and Humanitites” and “agency” for “office”; redesignated former (b) as present (b)(1) through (b)(3); substituted “agency” for “office” in present (b)(1); deleted “and humanities” following “arts” in present (b)(2); and substituted “under this subchapter” for “thereunder” in present (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment, in (a), deleted “as a separate and distinct agency” following “Arkansas Arts Council”, and substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage”; substituted “a director” for “an executive director” in (b)(1); and substituted “Director” for “Executive Director” in (b)(3).

13-8-104. Advisory council — Members.

(a)(1)

The Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council shall consist of seventeen (17) members appointed by the Governor and selected by reason of their widely recognized knowledge and interest in the arts.

(2)

Two (2) members shall be selected from each of the eight (8) planning and development districts of the State of Arkansas, and one (1) member shall be selected at large.

(b)

The term of office for each member shall be four (4) years beginning July 1 of the year of appointment until a successor has been appointed and qualified for the office.

(c)

A vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the term only.

(d)

Members may be reappointed to consecutive terms of office.

(e)

The advisory council shall from time to time select from its membership a chair and a vice chair.

(f)

No member of the advisory council shall receive pay for his or her services, but members may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-902.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 359, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1003; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 84; 2003, No. 608, § 5.

Publisher's Notes.

The terms of the members of the advisory council are arranged so that five terms expire every fourth year and four terms expire in each of the three intervening years.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1) and (a)(2) and made related changes; in present (a)(1), substituted “Arkansas Arts Council” for “Office of Arkansas State Arts and Humanities” and deleted “and humanities” following “arts” at the end; made gender neutral changes in (e) and (f); and substituted “§25-16-902” for “§25-16-901 et seq.” in (f).

13-8-105. Director.

(a)

The Director of the Arkansas Arts Council shall:

(1)

Be the ex officio secretary of the Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council but shall have no vote on matters coming before the Arkansas Arts Council;

(2)

Shall be an employee of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism; and

(3)

Shall be employed by the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism in consultation with the Arkansas Arts Council.

(b)

The director's salary and expenses of his or her office shall be fixed by the General Assembly within amounts available therefor by appropriation.

(c)

The Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council by resolution duly adopted may delegate to the director any of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon it by this subchapter, and the delegated powers and duties may be exercised by the director in the name of the Arkansas Arts Council.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 359, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1003; Acts 2003, No. 608, § 6; 2019, No. 910, §
5611.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment, in (a), substituted “Arkansas Arts Council” for “Office of Arkansas State Arts and Humanities” twice and substituted “shall be the ex officio” for “shall be appointed by the Governor. He shall be ex officio”; inserted “or her” in (b); substituted “agency” for “office” in (c); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director” for “Executive director” in the section heading; rewrote (a); and deleted “executive” preceding
“director” throughout the section.

13-8-106. Powers and duties.

(a)(1)

The Arkansas Arts Council shall be the official agency of the State of Arkansas for the development and coordination of a comprehensive statewide program for the arts.

(2)

In general, but not by way of limitation, the Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council shall have and exercise the following powers and duties:

(A)

To advise the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and General Assembly on matters relating to the arts;

(B)

To hold both public and private hearings for the purposes of furthering the objectives of this subchapter and to promulgate and adopt rules for the performance of its duties under this section;

(C)

To enter into agreements for any purpose consistent with the objectives and purposes of this subchapter with:

(i)

Other states or with the United States or any agency or instrumentality of the United States having duties or functions similar to the Arkansas Arts Council;

(ii)

Private associations or corporations;

(iii)

Private or public colleges or universities;

(iv)

Any public or private school; or

(v)

Individual persons; and

(D)

To do any and all other acts or things as may be deemed necessary and convenient by the Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council to foster and promote the development of the arts in this state.

(b)

Through the Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council, the Arkansas Arts Council shall establish and carry out a program of grants-in-aid to groups or, in appropriate cases, to individuals engaged in or concerned with the arts for the purpose of enabling them to provide or support in Arkansas, as follows:

(1)

Productions that have substantial artistic and cultural significance, giving emphasis to creativity and the maintenance and encouragement of professional excellence;

(2)

Projects that will encourage and assist artists and enable them to achieve standards of professional excellence; and

(3)

Other relevant projects, including surveys, research, education, and planning in the arts.

(c)(1)

The Arkansas Arts Council shall be the sole and official agency of this state to receive any funds allocated and disbursed to the State of Arkansas by the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof pursuant to the National Foundation on the Arts and Humanities Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. § 951 et seq., as well as funds received for any program related to the arts and not expressly designated for some other state agency and to disburse the funds in accordance with the terms and conditions, if any, relating to the grants.

(2)

The Director of the Arkansas Arts Council shall be the Governor's liaison officer to implement the National Foundation on the Arts and Humanities Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. § 951 et seq.

(3)

All programs of grants-in-aid as described in this section shall be administered by the director.

(d)

The Arkansas Arts Council shall be the sole and official agency of this state authorized to accept and receive, in addition to federal grants, any money and real and personal property donated, bequeathed, or devised for any purpose relating to the development and expansion of the arts and not expressly designated for some other state agency and to disburse and utilize those gifts for the purposes of this subchapter.

(e)(1)

The Arkansas Arts Council is authorized to establish and collect reasonable fees for, but not limited to:

(A)

Advertising in newsletters;

(B)

Requested mailing list labels; and

(C)

Conference registration.

(2)

The fees collected shall be deposited in a financial institution in this state and shall be used to support services that conform to the purposes of this subchapter.

(f)

The Arkansas Arts Council shall submit an annual report to the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism as of June 30 of each year, summarizing the Arkansas Arts Council's activities, expenditures, and grants of money or property from all sources for the preceding year. This report shall include recommendations directed toward furthering the purposes of this subchapter as the Arkansas Arts Council deems appropriate.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 359, § 4; 1985, No. 571, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1004; Acts 2003, No. 608, § 7; 2013, No. 715, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
5612-5614.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment inserted the present subdivision designations in (a); substituted “Arkansas Arts Council” for “Office of Arkansas State Arts and Humanities” in (a)(1), (a)(2) and (c)(2); deleted “and humanities” following “the arts” in (a)(1), (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(D), (c)(1) and (d); inserted “education” in (b)(3); redesignated former (e) as present (e)(1) and (e)(2); and substituted “agency” for “office” throughout.

The 2013 amendment added designations for (e)(1)(A) and (e)(1)(B) and added (e)(1)(C).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Governor” in (a)(1)(A) and (f); and substituted “director” for “executive director” in (c)(2) and (c)(3).

Subchapter 2

— Public Art Program

13-8-201 — 13-8-209. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Public Art Program, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 720, § 4. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

13-8-201. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1005.

13-8-202. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1007.

13-8-203. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1006.

13-8-204. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1009.

13-8-205. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1010; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 85; 2003, No. 364, §§ 1, 2.

13-8-206. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1011; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 86.

13-8-207. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1007; Acts 2007, No. 1273, § 1.

13-8-208. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1008.

13-8-209. Acts 1985, No. 1079, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1012; Acts 2003, No. 364, § 3; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 7; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 7.